Utah statutes.
41-1a-215.5 (Superseded 07/01/13).   Six-month registration.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "rental agreement" has the same meaning as defined in Section 31A-22-311;

(b)  "rental company" has the same meaning as defined in Section 31A-22-311; and

(c)  "rental fleet" means more than 25 motor vehicles that are:

(i)  subject to a uniform fee under Section 59-2-405.1;

(ii)  owned by a rental company;

(iii)  offered for rental without hired drivers through a rental agreement; and

(iv)  designated by the registered owner of the motor vehicle as a rental fleet vehicle at the time of registration.

(2) (a)  Beginning on January 1, 2007, a rental company owning or leasing a rental fleet may register a motor vehicle in the rental fleet for a six-month period that begins on the first day of the calendar month of registration and expires on the last day of the sixth month of registration.

(b)  If the last day of the registration period falls on a day in which the appropriate state or county offices are not open for business, the registration of the vehicle is extended to midnight of the next business day.

(3)  A motor vehicle registered under this section that remains in the rental fleet at the end of the original registration period shall be registered for 12 months as outlined under Section 41-1a-216.

(4)  A registration under Subsection (2) is subject to this chapter.

